Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-321
Voter registration
applications; availability; Secretary of State; designated voter registration
agency; mailing deadline; notice to applicant; when required; payment of postage
costs.

(1) Any elector may request a voter registration
application from the office of the Secretary of State or the election commissioner
or county clerk. The Secretary of State and the election commissioner or county
clerk shall make registration applications prescribed by the Secretary of
State available and may place the applications in public places. The Secretary
of State and the election commissioner or county clerk may require that all
unused applications be returned to his or her office and may place reasonable
limits on the amount of applications requested.

(2) If an elector returns the completed application to the
office of the Secretary of State or
submits an application to the Secretary of State pursuant to section 32-304,
the office shall deliver the application to the election commissioner or county
clerk of the county in which the elector resides not later than ten days after
receipt by the office, except that if the application is returned to the office or submitted pursuant to section 32-304 within
five days prior to the third Friday preceding any election, it shall be delivered
not later than five days after the date it is returned. The deadline for returning
a completed application to the office of the Secretary of State or submitting an application pursuant
to section 32-304 is the close of business on the third Friday
preceding an election to be registered to vote at such election. A registration
application received after the deadline shall not be processed by the election
commissioner or county clerk until after the election. The office of the Secretary
of State shall be a designated voter registration agency for purposes of section
7 of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993, 42 U.S.C. 1973gg-5, as such
section existed on March 11, 2008.

(3) If an elector mails the registration application to the
election commissioner or county clerk:

(a)(i) The application shall be postmarked on or before the
third Friday before the next election; or

(ii) The application shall be received not later than the
second Tuesday before the next election if the postmark is unreadable; and

(b) The application shall be processed by the election office
as a proper registration for the voter to be entitled to vote on the day of
the next election.

(4) If the registration application arrives after the registration
deadline, the application shall not be processed until after the election.
Written notice shall be given to any applicant whose registration application
failed to meet the registration deadline or was found to be incorrect or incomplete
and shall state the specific reason for rejection. If the application is incomplete,
the election commissioner or county clerk shall notify the applicant of the
failure to provide the required information, including failure to provide
identification if required, and provide the applicant with the opportunity
to submit an identification document as described in section 32-318.01 prior
to the deadline for voter registration or to complete and submit a corrected
registration application in a timely manner to allow for the proper registration
of the applicant prior to the next election. All postage costs related to
returning registration applications to the election commissioner or county
clerk shall be paid by the registrant.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 83;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 39;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 22;

Laws 2008, LB750, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB661, § 10.